Louisiana, session 2026, SB121.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
8 Section 1. R.S. 18:1276 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
9 §1276. Congressional districts
10 Louisiana shall be divided into six congressional districts, and the
11 qualified electors of each district shall elect one representative to the United
12 States House of Representatives. The districts shall be composed as follows:
13 (1) District 1 is composed of Precincts 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, 12, 13,
14 14, 15, 16, 17, 18, 19, 20, 21, 22, 23, 24, 25, 26, 27, 28, 29, 30, 31, 32, 33, 34, 35, 36,
15 37, 38, 39, 40, 41, 42, 43, 44, 45, 46, 51, 52, 53, 54, 55, 56, 57, 58, 59, 60, 61, 62, 63,
16 64, 65, 66, 68, 69, 70, 71, 72, 73, 74, 75, 76, 77, 78, 79, 80, 81, 82, 83, 84, 85, 86, 87,
17 88, 89, 90, 91, 92, 93, 94, 95, 96, 97, 98, 99, 100, 101, 102, 103, 105, 106, 117, 118,
18 119, 120, 121, 122, 123, 124, 125A, 125B, 126, 127, 128, 129, 130, 132, 134, 136,
19 192, 198, 199, 203, 246, 247, 248, 1-GI, 1-H, 2-H, 3-H, 4-H, 6-H, 7-H, 8-H, 9-H,
20 1-K, 2-K, 3-K, 4-K, 5-K, 6-KA, 6-KB, 7-KA, 7-KB, 8-K, 9-K, 10-K, 11-K, 12-K,
21 17-K, 19-K, 20-K, 25-K, 27-K, 34-K, 35-K, and 1-L of Jefferson Parish;
22 Precincts 3-2, 3-4, 3-5, 3-6, 3-7, 4-1, 4-3, 4-4, 4-5, 4-6, 6-3, 7-2, 7-3, 7-4, 8-1, 9-1,
23 9-2, 10-1, 10-2, 10-3, 10-4, 10-6, 10-8, 10-9, 10-10, 10-11, 10-12, 10-13, 10-14,
24 10-15, 10-16, and 11-1 of Lafourche Parish; Precincts 3-19, 3-20, 4-7, 4-8, 4-9,
25 4-11, 4-14, 4-15, 4-17, 4-17A, 4-18, 4-20, 4-21, 4-22, 4-23, 5-10, 5-11, 5-12, 5-13,
26 5-15, 5-16, 5-17, 5-18, 6-7, 6-8, 6-9, 7-41, 7-42, 9-45A, 14-4, 14-8, 14-9, 14-10,
27 14-11, 14-12, 14-13A, 14-14, 14-15, 14-16, 14-17, 14-18A, 14-19, 14-21, 14-25,
Page 1 of 7
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 121 ENROLLED
1 16-1, 16-1A, 16-2, 16-3, 16-4, 16-8, 17-1, 17-2, 17-17, 17-18, 17-18A, 17-19, and
2 17-20 of Orleans Parish; Plaquemines Parish; Precincts 33, 34, 41, 42, 42A, 43,
3 44, 45, 46, 50, 51, 52, 53, 54, and 55 of St. Bernard Parish; St. Tammany Parish;
4 Precincts 70, 70A, 71, 72, 72A, 73, 74, 120, 122A, 122B, 122C, 124, 137, 137A,
5 137C, 137D, 145, 147, 149, 149A, and 151 of Tangipahoa Parish; and Precincts
6 10, 11, 12, 14, 15, 16, 17, 18, 19, 20, 23, 25, 27, 28, 29, 31, 33, 34, 35, 37, 38, 39, 41,
7 42, 43, 45, 48, 49, 51, 52, 53, 55, 56, 57, 59, 60, 62, 63, 68, 69, 71, 72, 81, 83, 84, 85,
8 87, 88, 90, 94, 95, 100, and 110 of Terrebonne Parish.
9 (2) District 2 is composed of Precincts 45, 47, 48, 50, 51, 52, 53, 54, 55,
10 and 57 of Ascension Parish; Precincts 1-1, 1-2, 1-3, 1-4, 1-5, 1-6, 1-10, 1-11, 1-13,
11 1-14, 1-15, 1-16, 1-18, 1-19, 1-21, 1-22, 1-23, 1-24, 1-25, 1-26, 1-27, 1-28, 1-29,
12 1-30, 1-31, 1-32, 1-36, 1-38, 1-45, 1-50, 1-51, 1-58, 1-61, 1-62, 1-63, 1-67, 1-77,
13 1-84, 1-85, 1-86, 1-91, 1-92, 1-93, 1-94, 1-95, 1-100, 1-101, 1-104, 2-1, 2-2, 2-9,
14 2-10, 2-11, 2-12, 2-16, 2-22, 2-23, 2-25, 2-27, and 2-30 of East Baton Rouge
15 Parish; Precincts 1, 3, 7, 9, 10, 10B, 11, 12, 13, 14, 14A, 15, 16, 18, 19, 20, 21, and
16 22 of Iberville Parish; Precincts 104, 108, 115, 116, 131, 133, 138, 150A, 150B,
17 151, 152, 153, 154, 155, 156, 157A, 170, 171, 172, 173, 174, 175, 176, 177, 178,
18 179A, 179B, 180, 181, 182, 183, 184, 185A, 185B, 187, 188, 189, 190, 191, 193A,
19 193B, 194A, 194B, 195, 196, 197A, 197B, 200, 201, 202, 204, 205, 210, 211, 212,
20 213A, 213B, 213C, 214A, 214B, 215, 216A, 216B, 217, 225, 226, 227, 228, 229,
21 230, 231, 232A, 232B, 234, 235, 236, 237, 238A, 238B, 1-G, 2-G, 3-G, 4-G, 5-G,
22 6-G, 7-G, 8-G, 9-G, 10-G, 11-G, 12-G, 13-G, 13-KA, 13-KB, 14-K, 15-K, 16-K,
23 21-K, 22-K, 23-K, 24-K, 26-K, 28-K, 29-K, 30-K, 31-K, 33-K, 1-W, 3-W, 4-W,
24 5-W, 6-W, and 7-W of Jefferson Parish; Precincts 1-1, 1-2, 1-5, 1-6, 2-1, 2-2, 2-4,
25 2-6, 2-7, 3-1, 3-8, 3-9, 3-12, 3-14, 3-15, 3-18, 4-2, 4-3, 4-6, 5-1, 5-2, 5-3, 5-5, 5-7,
26 5-8, 5-9, 6-1, 6-2, 6-4, 6-6, 7-1, 7-2, 7-4, 7-5, 7-6, 7-7, 7-8, 7-9A, 7-10, 7-11, 7-12,
27 7-13, 7-14, 7-15, 7-16, 7-17, 7-18, 7-19, 7-20, 7-21, 7-23, 7-24, 7-25, 7-25A, 7-26,
28 7-27, 7-27B, 7-28, 7-28A, 7-29, 7-30, 7-32, 7-33, 7-35, 7-37, 7-37A, 7-40, 8-1, 8-2,
29 8-4, 8-6, 8-7, 8-8, 8-9, 8-12, 8-13, 8-14, 8-15, 8-19, 8-20, 8-21, 8-22, 8-23, 8-24,
30 8-25, 8-26, 8-27, 8-28, 8-30, 9-1, 9-3, 9-4, 9-5, 9-6, 9-7, 9-8, 9-9, 9-10, 9-11, 9-12,
Page 2 of 7
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 121 ENROLLED
1 9-13, 9-14, 9-15, 9-16, 9-17, 9-19, 9-21, 9-23, 9-25, 9-26, 9-28, 9-28C, 9-29, 9-30,
2 9-30A, 9-31, 9-31A, 9-31B, 9-31D, 9-32, 9-33, 9-34A, 9-35, 9-35A, 9-36, 9-36B,
3 9-37, 9-38, 9-38A, 9-39, 9-39B, 9-40, 9-40A, 9-40C, 9-41, 9-41A, 9-41B, 9-41C,
4 9-41D, 9-42, 9-42C, 9-43A, 9-43B, 9-43C, 9-43E, 9-43F, 9-43G, 9-43H, 9-43I,
5 9-43J, 9-43K, 9-43L, 9-43M, 9-43N, 9-44, 9-44A, 9-44B, 9-44D, 9-44E, 9-44F,
6 9-44G, 9-44I, 9-44J, 9-44L, 9-44M, 9-44N, 9-44O, 9-44P, 9-44Q, 9-45, 10-3, 10-6,
7 10-7, 10-8, 10-9, 10-11, 10-12, 10-13, 10-14, 11-2, 11-3, 11-4, 11-5, 11-8, 11-9,
8 11-10, 11-11, 11-12, 11-13, 11-14, 11-17, 12-1, 12-2, 12-3, 12-4, 12-5, 12-6, 12-7,
9 12-9, 12-10, 12-11, 12-12, 12-13, 12-14, 12-16, 12-17, 12-19, 13-1, 13-2, 13-3, 13-4,
10 13-5, 13-6, 13-7, 13-8, 13-9, 13-10, 13-11, 13-12, 13-13, 13-14, 13-15, 13-16, 14-1,
11 14-2, 14-3, 14-5, 14-6, 14-7, 14-20, 14-23, 14-24A, 14-26, 15-1, 15-2, 15-3, 15-5,
12 15-6, 15-8, 15-9, 15-10, 15-11, 15-12, 15-12A, 15-13, 15-13A, 15-13B, 15-14,
13 15-14A, 15-14B, 15-14C, 15-14D, 15-14E, 15-14F, 15-14G, 15-15, 15-15A,
14 15-15B, 15-16, 15-17, 15-17A, 15-17B, 15-18, 15-18A, 15-18B, 15-18C, 15-18D,
15 15-18E, 15-18F, 15-19, 15-19A, 15-19B, 15-19C, 16-5, 16-6, 16-7, 16-9, 17-3, 17-4,
16 17-5, 17-6, 17-7, 17-8, 17-9, 17-10, 17-11, 17-12, 17-13, 17-13A, 17-14, 17-15, and
17 17-16 of Orleans Parish; Precincts 10, 11, 12, 13, 14, 15, 20, 21, 22, 23, 24, 25, 30,
18 31, 32, and 40 of St. Bernard Parish; Precincts 1-1, 1-2, 1-3, 1-4, 1-5, 2-1, 2-3,
19 2-4, 2-5, 4-1, 4-2, 4-3, 4-4, 4-5, 7-1, 7-2, 7-3, 7-4, and 7-5 of St. Charles Parish;
20 St. James Parish; Precincts 1-1, 1-2, 1-3, 1-5, 2-5, 3-1, 3-2, 3-4, 3-7, 4-2, 4-3, 5-2,
21 5-3, 6-1, 6-3, 6-4, 7-1, and 7-4 of St. John the Baptist Parish; and Precincts 1B,
22 1C, 1D, 1E, 6, 7B, 8, 10, 13A, 14A, and 15 of West Baton Rouge Parish.
23 (3) District 3 is composed of Acadia Parish; Precincts 167, 260, 261, 262,
24 300, 301, 302, 303, 304, 305, 306, 307, 308, 309E, 309W, 310, 311, 312, 313E,
25 313W, 314, 315E, 315W, 316E, 316W, 317, 318, 319N, 319S, 320E, 320W, 321,
26 322, 323, 324, 325, 326, 327, 328, 329, 330, 331, 332N, 332S, 333, 334, 335, 336,
27 337, 338, 339, 340, 361, 362, 363, 364, 365, 366, 367, 368, 369, 370, 371N, 371S,
28 372, 464, 800, 801, 861E, and 861W of Calcasieu Parish; Cameron Parish;
29 Iberia Parish; Jefferson Davis Parish; Lafayette Parish; Precincts 7, 10, 10A,
30 11B, 12, 13A, 14, 14A, 14B, 16, 16A, 17, 18, 18A, 18B, 19, 19A, 20B, 21, 21A, 22,
Page 3 of 7
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 121 ENROLLED
1 22B, 23, 23A, 24, 24B, 25, 26, 26A, 27, 28, 29, 29A, 30, 30A, 30B, 31, 32, 32A, 33,
2 33A, 34, 34A, 35, 36, 37, 37A, 38, 39, 39A, 40, 41, 41A, 42, 43, 44, 44A, 44B, 45,
3 46, 47, 48, 49, 50, 50A, 51, 51A, and 52 of St. Landry Parish; Precincts 3, 4, 5,
4 6, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, 12, 13, 14, 15, 16, 17, 18, 19, 20, 21, 22, 23, 24, 25, 26, 27, 28, 29,
5 30, 31, 32, 33, 34, 35, 36, 37, 38, 39, 40, 41, 42, and 43 of St. Martin Parish; St.
6 Mary Parish; Precincts 1, 2, 5, 7, 8, 64, 67, 73, and 76 of Terrebonne Parish; and
7 Vermilion Parish.
8 (4) District 4 is composed of Allen Parish; Beauregard Parish; Bienville
9 Parish; Bossier Parish; Caddo Parish; Precincts 160E, 160W, 161, 162E, 162W,
10 163, 164, 165, 166E, 166W, 360, 400, 401, 402, 403, 404, 405, 406, 407, 408, 440,
11 441, 460E, 460W, 461, 463, 465, 466E, 466W, 467, 468, 469, 560, 561, 562, 600,
12 601, 602, 603, 660, 661, 662, 663, 664, 700, 701, 702, 703, 760, 761, 762, 860N,
13 and 860S of Calcasieu Parish; Claiborne Parish; De Soto Parish; Evangeline
14 Parish; Natchitoches Parish; Red River Parish; Sabine Parish; Union Parish;
15 Vernon Parish; and Webster Parish.
16 (5) District 5 is composed of Avoyelles Parish; Caldwell Parish;
17 Catahoula Parish; Concordia Parish; East Carroll Parish; East Feliciana
18 Parish; Franklin Parish; Grant Parish; Jackson Parish; La Salle Parish;
19 Lincoln Parish; Madison Parish; Morehouse Parish; Ouachita Parish; Rapides
20 Parish; Richland Parish; St. Helena Parish; Precincts 1, 1A, 1B, 1C, 1D, 2, 2A,
21 2B, 2C, 3, 4, 4A, 4B, 5, 6, 7A, 8, 9, 9A, 11, 13, 15, and 20 of St. Landry Parish;
22 Precincts 2, 6, 11, 15, 16, 17, 28, 33, 40A, 41, 42, 43, 44, 45A, 45B, 46, 47, 49, 101,
23 102, 104, 106, 106A, 107, 108, 109, 110, 111A, 112, 114, 115B, 116, 117, 118,
24 118A, 119, 120A, 120B, 121, 121A, 123, 125, 127, 129A, 133, 133A, 137B, 139,
25 141, 141A, 143, and 143A of Tangipahoa Parish; Tensas Parish; Washington
26 Parish; West Carroll Parish; West Feliciana Parish; and Winn Parish.
27 (6) District 6 is composed of Precincts 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, 12, 13,
28 14, 15, 16, 17, 18, 19, 20, 21, 22, 23, 24, 25, 26, 27, 28, 30, 31, 32, 33, 34, 35, 36, 37,
29 38, 39, 40, 41, 42, 43, 44, 58, 61, 62, 63, 64, 65, 66, 68, 69, 71, 72, 73, 76, 77, and
30 78 of Ascension Parish; Assumption Parish; Precincts 1-7, 1-8, 1-9, 1-12, 1-20,
Page 4 of 7
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 121 ENROLLED
1 1-33, 1-34, 1-35, 1-37, 1-39, 1-40, 1-41, 1-42, 1-43, 1-44, 1-46, 1-47, 1-48, 1-49,
2 1-52, 1-53, 1-54, 1-55, 1-56, 1-57, 1-59, 1-60, 1-64, 1-65, 1-66, 1-69, 1-70, 1-71,
3 1-72, 1-73, 1-74, 1-75, 1-76, 1-78, 1-79, 1-80, 1-81, 1-82, 1-83, 1-87, 1-88, 1-89,
4 1-90, 1-96, 1-97, 1-98, 1-99, 1-102, 1-103, 1-105, 1-106, 1-107, 2-3, 2-4, 2-5, 2-6,
5 2-7, 2-8, 2-13, 2-14, 2-15, 2-17, 2-18, 2-19, 2-20, 2-21, 2-24, 2-26, 2-28, 2-29, 2-31,
6 2-32, 2-33, 2-34, 2-35, 2-36, 2-37, 2-38, 3-1, 3-2, 3-3, 3-4, 3-5, 3-6, 3-7, 3-8, 3-9,
7 3-10, 3-11, 3-12, 3-13, 3-14, 3-15, 3-16, 3-17, 3-18, 3-19, 3-20, 3-21, 3-22, 3-23,
8 3-24, 3-25, 3-26, 3-27, 3-28, 3-29, 3-30, 3-31, 3-32, 3-33, 3-34, 3-35, 3-36, 3-37,
9 3-38, 3-39, 3-40, 3-41, 3-42, 3-43, 3-44, 3-45, 3-46, 3-47, 3-48, 3-49, 3-50, 3-51,
10 3-52, 3-53, 3-54, 3-55, 3-56, 3-57, 3-58, 3-59, 3-60, 3-61, 3-62, 3-63, 3-64, 3-65,
11 3-66, 3-67, 3-68, 3-69, 3-70, 3-71, 3-72, 3-73, 3-74, 3-75, and 3-76 of East Baton
12 Rouge Parish; Precincts 4, 5, 6, 15A, 17, 24, 25, 26, 27, 28, 29, 31, and 32 of
13 Iberville Parish; Precincts 1-1, 1-2, 1-3, 1-4, 1-5, 1-6, 2-1, 2-1A, 2-2, 2-3, 2-5, 2-6,
14 2-7, 2-8, 2-9, 2-10, 2-11, 2-12, 2-13, 2-14, 2-15, 2-16, 3-1, 3-3, 4-2, 5-1, 5-1A, 5-2,
15 5-3, 6-1, 6-2, 6-4, 6-5, 7-1, 11-2, 11-3, 11-4, and 11-5 of Lafourche Parish;
16 Livingston Parish; Pointe Coupee Parish; Precincts 1-6, 2-6, 3-1, 3-2, 3-3, 5-1,
17 5-3, 5-4, 5-5, 6-1, 6-2, 6-3, 6-4, and 6-6 of St. Charles Parish; Precincts 1-4, 1-6,
18 1-7, 2-1, 2-2, 2-3, 2-4, 3-3, 4-1, 4-4, 4-5, 5-1, 5-4, 5-5, 6-2, 6-5, 7-2, and 7-3 of St.
19 John the Baptist Parish; Precincts 1 and 2 of St. Martin Parish; and Precincts
20 1A, 2A, 2B, 3, 4A, 4B, 5, 7A, 9, 13B, 14B, 16, 17, 18, 19, 20, 21, and 22 of West
21 Baton Rouge Parish.
22 Section 2. R.S. 18:1276.1 is hereby repealed.
23 Section 3.(A) The precincts referenced in this Act are those contained in the file
24 named "2026 Precinct Shapefiles (1-27-2026)" available on the website of the Legislature
25 of Louisiana on the effective date of this Section. The 2026 Precinct Shapefiles are based
26 upon those Voting Districts (VTDs) contained in the 2020 Census Redistricting TIGER/Line
27 Shapefiles for the State of Louisiana as those files have been modified and validated through
28 the data verification program of the Louisiana Senate and the Louisiana House of
29 Representatives to represent precinct changes submitted through January 27, 2026, to the
30 Legislature of Louisiana by parish governing authorities pursuant to the provisions of R.S.
Page 5 of 7
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 121 ENROLLED
1 18:532 and 532.1.
2 (B) When a precinct referenced in this Act has been subdivided by action of the
3 parish governing authority on a nongeographic basis or subdivided by action of the parish
4 governing authority on a geographic basis in accordance with the provisions of R.S.
5 18:532.1, the enumeration in this Act of the general precinct designation shall include all
6 nongeographic and all geographic subdivisions thereof, however such subdivisions may be
7 designated.
8 (C) The territorial limits of the districts as provided in this Act shall continue in
9 effect until changed by law regardless of any subsequent change made to the precincts by
10 the parish governing authority.
11 Section 4. The provisions of this Act shall not reduce the term of office of any person
12 holding any position or office on the effective date of this Section for which the appointment
13 or election is based upon a congressional district as composed pursuant to R.S. 18:1276.1.
14 Any position or office that is filled by appointment or election based upon a congressional
15 district and that is to be filled after January 3, 2027, shall be appointed or elected from a
16 district as it is described in Section 1 of this Act.
17 Section 5.(A) Solely for the purposes of qualifying for election and the conduct of
18 the election of representatives to the United States Congress at the regularly scheduled
19 election for representatives to the congress in 2026, the provisions of Section 1 of this Act
20 shall become effective upon signature of this Act by the governor or, if not signed by the
21 governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature by the
22 governor, as provided in Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If this Act
23 is vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, the provisions of
24 Section 1 of this Act shall become effective on the day following such approval for the
25 purposes established in this Subsection.
26 (B) For subsequent elections of representatives to the United States Congress and for
27 all other purposes, the provisions of Section 1 of this Act shall become effective at noon on
28 January 3, 2027.
29 (C) The provisions of Section 2 of this Act shall become effective at noon on January
30 3, 2027.
Page 6 of 7
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 121 ENROLLED
1 (D) The provisions of this Section and Sections 3 and 4 of this Act shall become
2 effective upon signature of this Act by the governor or, if not signed by the governor, upon
3 expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature by the governor, as provided
4 in Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If this Act is vetoed by the
5 governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, the provisions of this Section and
6 Sections 3 and 4 of this Act shall become effective on the day following such approval.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 7 of 7
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

Plan Statistics
Plan: Senate Bill 121 Enrolled
Districts: # of Members Actual Population Ideal Population Absolute Deviation Relative Deviation
District 1 1 776,249 776,292 -43 -0.006%
District 2 1 776,248 776,292 -44 -0.006%
District 3 1 776,355 776,292 63 0.008%
District 4 1 776,337 776,292 45 0.006%
District 5 1 776,285 776,292 -7 -0.001%
District 6 1 776,283 776,292 -9 -0.001%
Grand Total: 6 4,657,757 4,657,752
Ideal Population Per Member: 776292 Ideal - Actual: -5
Number of Districts for Plan Type: 6
Remainder: 5
Unassigned Population: 0
Range of District Populations: 776,248 to 776,355
Absolute Mean Deviation: 18
Absolute Range: -44 to 63
Absolute Overall Range: 107
Relative Mean Deviation: 0.00%
Relative Range: -0.01% to 0.01%
Relative Overall Range: 0.02%

District Summary
Plan: Senate Bill 121 Enrolled
Reg Dem Reg Rep Reg Other
Total Reg Total Total Total Total
Population VAP Total Dec 2025 Dec 2025 Dec 2025 Dec 2025
District 1 776,249 603,226 441,675 107,287 200,822 133,566
100.000% 100.000% 73.219% 24.291% 45.468% 30.241%
District 2 776,248 598,884 409,951 249,323 54,153 106,475
100.000% 100.000% 68.452% 60.818% 13.210% 25.973%
District 3 776,355 586,663 425,597 135,556 177,589 112,452
100.000% 100.000% 72.545% 31.851% 41.727% 26.422%
District 4 776,337 590,468 401,517 128,949 171,412 101,156
100.000% 100.000% 68.000% 32.115% 42.691% 25.193%
District 5 776,285 597,119 395,716 135,267 167,617 92,832
100.000% 100.000% 66.271% 34.183% 42.358% 23.459%
District 6 776,283 594,188 435,817 134,701 182,480 118,636
100.000% 100.000% 73.347% 30.908% 41.871% 27.222%
Grand Total 4,657,757 3,570,548 2,510,273 891,083 954,073 665,117
100.000% 100.000% 70.305% 35.497% 38.007% 26.496%

District Parish Summary
Plan: Senate Bill 121 Enrolled
Reg Dem Reg Rep Reg Other
Total Reg Total Total Total Total
Population VAP Total Dec 2025 Dec 2025 Dec 2025 Dec 2025
District 1
*Jefferson 235,028 188,072 128,598 31,373 57,298 39,927
*Lafourche 43,870 33,582 22,192 5,902 10,194 6,096
*Orleans 56,988 47,510 33,746 13,741 8,955 11,050
Plaquemines 23,515 17,334 12,130 3,924 4,971 3,235
*St. Bernard 19,068 13,899 10,761 3,988 3,402 3,371
St. Tammany 264,570 202,228 168,850 34,289 83,147 51,414
*Tangipahoa 41,739 31,723 23,336 4,422 12,211 6,703
*Terrebonne 91,471 68,878 42,062 9,648 20,644 11,770
District 1 776,249 603,226 441,675 107,287 200,822 133,566
100.000% 100.000% 73.219% 24.291% 45.468% 30.241%
District 2
*Ascension 9,737 7,283 5,100 3,426 818 856
*East Baton Rouge107,086 81,068 50,659 37,244 2,142 11,273
*Iberville 20,415 16,098 11,193 6,576 2,313 2,304
*Jefferson 205,753 156,582 98,221 48,449 20,244 29,528
*Orleans 327,009 258,686 183,813 124,098 12,312 47,403
*St. Bernard 24,696 17,876 11,445 3,924 3,330 4,191
*St. Charles 27,393 20,459 16,445 5,323 6,859 4,263
St. James 20,192 15,505 13,459 7,633 3,537 2,289
*St. John the 23,479 17,706 13,719 9,244 1,463 3,012
Baptist
*West Baton Rouge 10,488 7,621 5,897 3,406 1,135 1,356
District 2 776,248 598,884 409,951 249,323 54,153 106,475
100.000% 100.000% 68.452% 60.818% 13.210% 25.973%
District 3
Acadia 57,576 42,943 33,583 9,481 16,401 7,701
*Calcasieu 126,768 96,181 56,656 21,388 19,971 15,297
Cameron 5,617 4,358 3,924 844 2,118 962
Iberia 69,929 52,791 36,944 12,313 15,184 9,447
Jefferson Davis 32,250 24,039 18,329 4,957 8,478 4,894
Lafayette 241,753 183,875 138,622 38,312 60,999 39,311
*St. Landry 67,189 50,066 39,454 17,106 13,047 9,301
*St. Martin 50,399 38,250 30,238 10,603 12,410 7,225
St. Mary 49,406 37,521 26,695 9,267 9,994 7,434
*Terrebonne 18,109 13,627 8,490 2,677 3,436 2,377
Vermilion 57,359 43,012 32,662 8,608 15,551 8,503
District 3 776,355 586,663 425,597 135,556 177,589 112,452
100.000% 100.000% 72.545% 31.851% 41.727% 26.422%
District 4
Allen 22,750 17,510 10,797 3,362 5,053 2,382
Beauregard 36,549 27,489 21,046 3,672 11,362 6,012
Bienville 12,981 10,073 7,942 3,498 2,889 1,555
Bossier 128,746 95,876 64,006 14,484 31,775 17,747
Caddo 237,848 182,407 119,564 52,437 37,457 29,670
*Calcasieu 90,017 66,985 46,686 9,002 24,424 13,260
Claiborne 14,170 11,507 7,439 2,884 2,826 1,729
De Soto 26,812 20,440 17,070 5,932 7,395 3,743
Evangeline 32,350 24,408 18,176 7,093 7,463 3,620
Natchitoches 37,515 29,349 19,037 7,518 6,812 4,707
Red River 7,620 5,714 4,877 2,218 1,747 912
Sabine 22,155 17,064 12,460 3,010 6,599 2,851
Union 21,107 16,632 12,695 3,322 6,653 2,720
Vernon 48,750 36,261 20,095 3,985 10,497 5,613
Webster 36,967 28,753 19,627 6,532 8,460 4,635
District 4 776,337 590,468 401,517 128,949 171,412 101,156
100.000% 100.000% 68.000% 32.115% 42.691% 25.193%
District 5
Avoyelles 39,693 30,578 19,578 7,487 7,622 4,469
Caldwell 9,645 7,478 5,381 1,214 2,944 1,223
Catahoula 8,906 6,951 5,626 1,981 2,445 1,200
Concordia 18,687 14,217 9,841 4,059 3,753 2,029
East Carroll 7,459 5,901 3,106 1,880 682 544
East Feliciana 19,539 16,183 12,351 4,876 4,703 2,772
Franklin 19,774 15,028 11,061 3,534 5,395 2,132
Grant 22,169 17,527 11,346 2,136 6,269 2,941
Jackson 15,031 11,783 8,696 2,713 4,187 1,796
La Salle 14,791 11,563 7,863 1,383 4,887 1,593
Lincoln 48,396 38,655 21,272 6,783 9,161 5,328
Madison 10,017 7,435 5,394 2,855 1,377 1,162
Morehouse 25,629 20,062 13,316 5,563 4,880 2,873

District Parish Summary
Plan: Senate Bill 121 Enrolled
Reg Dem Reg Rep Reg Other
Total Reg Total Total Total Total
Population VAP Total Dec 2025 Dec 2025 Dec 2025 Dec 2025
District 5
Ouachita 160,368 120,200 80,532 26,315 35,088 19,129
Rapides 130,023 98,792 66,219 20,448 28,894 16,877
Richland 20,043 15,383 11,325 3,695 5,132 2,498
St. Helena 10,920 8,463 7,499 4,179 1,984 1,336
*St. Landry 15,351 11,745 9,927 5,047 2,871 2,009
*Tangipahoa 91,418 69,768 38,605 13,477 15,298 9,830
Tensas 4,147 3,235 3,024 1,719 828 477
Washington 45,463 34,951 24,047 8,242 9,837 5,968
West Carroll 9,751 7,532 5,144 1,069 2,963 1,112
West Feliciana 15,310 12,783 7,463 2,468 3,265 1,730
Winn 13,755 10,906 7,100 2,144 3,152 1,804
District 5 776,285 597,119 395,716 135,267 167,617 92,832
100.000% 100.000% 66.271% 34.183% 42.358% 23.459%
District 6
*Ascension 116,763 84,674 70,009 18,761 31,386 19,862
Assumption 21,039 16,616 12,187 5,514 4,217 2,456
*East Baton Rouge349,695 274,544 186,589 67,019 68,154 51,416
*Iberville 9,826 7,988 6,351 2,792 2,201 1,358
*Lafourche 53,687 41,037 30,146 7,588 14,223 8,335
Livingston 142,282 105,141 80,500 13,540 44,448 22,512
Pointe Coupee 20,758 16,250 13,201 5,858 4,426 2,917
*St. Charles 25,156 19,082 15,236 4,705 6,265 4,266
*St. John the 18,998 14,797 10,980 5,321 2,818 2,841
Baptist
*St. Martin 1,368 1,154 819 159 470 190
*West Baton Rouge 16,711 12,905 9,799 3,444 3,872 2,483
District 6 776,283 594,188 435,817 134,701 182,480 118,636
100.000% 100.000% 73.347% 30.908% 41.871% 27.222%
Grand Total 4,657,757 3,570,548 2,510,273 891,083 954,073 665,117
100.000% 100.000% 70.305% 35.497% 38.007% 26.496%

Congress - Statewide - Senate Bill 121 Enrolled (2026RS)
Claiborne Union Morehouse
E Carroll
W Carroll
Bossier
Caddo Webster Lincoln
Ouachita
Richland
Bienville Madison
Jackson
Franklin
Red River
Caldwell
De Soto
Tensas
Winn
! Natchitoches ! Catahoula
4 5
La Salle
Grant
Sabine
Concordia
Rapides
Vernon
Avoyelles
W Feliciana E Feliciana Washington
St. Helena
Evangeline
Beauregard Allen Pointe Coupee Tangipahoa
St. Landry
EBR
! WBR Livingston
6 St. Tammany
Acadia
Calcasieu Jeff Davis Lafayette St. Martin Iberville Ascension
St. John
! Orleans
3 St. James !
2
Cameron Assumption St. Charles St. Bernard
Vermilion St. Martin
Jefferson
St. Mary !
1
Lafourche
Iberia
Plaquemines
Terrebonne

Congress - Orleans/Jefferson - Senate Bill 121 Enrolled (2026RS)
St. John
ZZZZZZ
ZZZZZZ ZZZZZZ
9-45A
ZZZZZZ
9-41B
! Orleans 9-45
1 9-41
1-K 9-44P
2-K
7-KA 9-42C 9-44
8-K
! 6 7-KB 5-K 3 7-37A 8-30 9-44M 9-44I 9-41C
10-K 1 9-31D 9-42
14-K 17-K 19-K 7 8 5 13 24 25 2627 28 30 34 39 44 4-21 7-40 7-37 9-33
5-5 9 11 18 31 45
6-4 23-K 24-K 25-K 51 58 59 21 22 23 29 33 38 43 46 5-16 9-32
52 60 73 78 8485 98 7-19 9-28
3-1 26- 3 K 1-K 33- 2 K 9-K 115 56 5 5 4 7 61 65 68 66 69 71 72 7580 79 87 103 17-17 4-9 7-17 8-9 9-6 12 15 22 33 41
2-6 5-1 5-3 5-4 2-4 150A 124 Jefferson 125B 126 132 134 136 2-7 3-8 3-1 2-1 9 1 - 5 9 -15 9-1 11 10 13 14 21 23 24 32 34 50
170
2-1 7-H 8-H 9-H 1-1 2-G ! 20 30 31 43
2-3 152 14-10 2 42 46 51
7-5 St. Charles 153 154 155 1-W 13-1 211 225226 15-14G 42A 45 St. Bernard
7-3 151 171 227228 15-18E 15-19A 44
157A 5-W
7-2 6-W 172 173 229
179A
183
185A
230 2!-1
2-5 200181 182 184 212 214B 234 1 52
187 201 237 5-1
156 189
204 236 54
215 217
188 190 196
194A
202 3-1
191 205 55
53
192
4-1
194B
198 5-1A 6-1 1-1Plaquemines
197A
4-2
199
203
8-1 1-2
246 1-2

Congress - River Parishes - Senate Bill 121 Enrolled (2026RS)
22 2 W 1 BR 9 EBR 10 3-56 7 1 64 16 8 19 9 6 1 8 0 1 5 2 13 76 14 43 18 22 15 ! 1 149A Tangipahoa 151 ZZZZZZ
10B 62 77 17 11 18 15 Livingston
21
13 6 63 7872 20 24 25 41 22 16
71 23
26 24 15A 7 11 73 37 2 3 8 0 58 31 32 33 26 69 27 17 ZZZZZZ 5-4
36 38 43
12 Ascension
Iberville ! 35 ZZZZZZ
6 1 6 65 34
25
45
66
3
39 44 40 5-5 St. John
2-1 2-3
47 2
4 53 48 50
5 4-2 7-3 ZZZZZZ
54 12 2-5 7-2
55 11
9
6 2-2 2-4 3-2 1-5 1-4
1-6
7-1
7-2 1-1 ! 2 St. James 10 8 23 1-2 6-1 6-2
1 ! 1-1 Iberia 7-3 6-3 13 4 1-3 6-4 5-5 Jefferson
3 16
15 1-1
6-1
8-1 1-2 1-2 3-1
6-2
19
3-3 5-4
14 17 1-1 1-3 2-6 5-1 2-4
! 5-2 2-1 18 St. Charles 2-3
6 Assumption 7-5
5-3 1-5
9-1
1 4-1
2-5
2-5
6-5 4-4
6-2
6-3
4-3
6-1
4-3 5-1
4-1 5-1A 6-4
St. Martin 2-4 2-2
5-3 Lafourche 7-2
5-2
2 1-6 1-5 ! 1 7-3 4-2
2-12 7-1
1-2 1-4
1-1 1 2-13
3-1 ! 5
3 3-1 8-1
!
3 22 St. Mary 3-2 2 Terrebonne 11-4 3-2 7-4
3-7

Congress - Terrebonne/Lafourche - Senate Bill 121 Enrolled (2026RS)
5-2 2-1 1-2 13 St. James 14 18 1-1 St. John 1-3 1-5 7-5 2-3 152 Orleans Orleans
5-3 151
1 9-1 2-5 6-5 6-2 6-3 4-1 ! 4-3 4-4 2-5 156 188 5-1 2-1
6-1 2
5-1
10 ! 6 St. Martin 4-1Assumption 2-2 6-4 5-1A 6-1
7-2 St. Charles
2 5-2 1-1
7-3 199 203 197A
7-1
3-1 1-1 1-2 1 4-2 246 1-L
3-1 Plaquemines
1-2
22 2 3-2 7-4 8-1
3-7
21 3-5
32 37 43 45 3-2 11-3 3-6 8-1 247
28 34 64 5 7 8 11-5 3-3 4-1 7-1
23 10 37
28
44
27 9-1 10-1
14 51 62
42 11-2
29 9-2
16 4-5 10-2 Jefferson
55
St. Mary 68
83 8-2
67 52 56 10-15
71
4-6
Lafourche 248
10-3
59 10-13
100
24 72 10-4
60 10-11
!
! 1
3
11-1
10-10
10-9
10-6
Terrebonne
57
73
53
10-8
1-GI
63
248
63

Congress - EBR/WBR - Senate Bill 121 Enrolled (2026RS)
!
W Felici ! ana E Feliciana 2-36 2-29 2-28 4-1 St. Helena 5
5
18 12 2-37 2-38
2-7
2-18 2-14 2-6
3B
2-34
19
1
2-15 2-8
2-5
2-17 3
2-33 1A
20 20 2-13 2-31 1D 6
2-3
Pointe Coupee
1C
17 2-20 2-2 2-4 3-1 3-6 1B 2
2-24 2-9 2-25 3-37 2A
22 1-95 1-101 2-22 2-12 2-10 3-2 3-14 3-61 4B 4 4A 3A
3-30 39B
1-91
2-11
16B 3-25
1-92 39A
19 1-100 1-86 2-27 39 40 40A 5D 5A
1-85 2-16 3-58 5B 5
1-77 2-30 3-46 3-26 26B
1-23 1-58
!
2 3-8 Livingston 35
17 1-21 1-25 1-31 2-1 EBR 3-42 3-9 26 26A 41 35A
31 21 16 1-18 1-19 1-2 1 7 -61 1-62 1-9 ! 3 6 1-78 1-82 1-70 3-24 1-9 3- 7 54 25 27 7A 36 36A
WBR 14B 14A 13A 15 9 1-1 1 1 - 1 1 - - 6 3 16 1 1 1 - - - 1 1 3 0 5 8 1 1 - - 3 1 1 2 - 4 37 1- 1 3 - 6 57 1-2 1-104 1-33 1-96 1-52 1- 1 5 - 4 9 1 1 - - 8 6 3 0 1 1 - - 2 5 0 5 1-8 1 7 -71 3-1 3 2 -72 28 24C 24D 7D 7C 7 20
28 10 1-71-40 1-34 1-53 3-28 3-21 24B 7B
18 1-51 1-8 1-48 1-79 1-49 1-74 1-72 1-81 1-98 24
5 1-5 1-59 1-65 1-105 3-31 3-27 1-90 1-89 3-73 23A 23B
29 2B 3 7A 7B 6 1-10 1 2 -46 1 1 -6 -4 9 1 1-42 1-5 1 6 -106 1-73 1-66 3-51 3-17 1-80 3 3 - - 1 2 3 9 3-11 1 1 - - 1 9 0 9 3 3-7 3-5 3 9 -41 3-3 3-38 3-71 23C 21 21B
1-76 1-43 3-16
4B 1-47 3-52 3-60 3-15 23
3-69 1-75 3-74 3-39 3-33
4A 1D 8 3-5 1-12 3-55 3-35 3-45
3-50 3-23 3 3 - - 3 6 6 4 3-49 3-18 3-48 3-34 3-66 3-22 3-47 21A
3-4 3-40
3-62
3-57
27 1A 3-67
Iberville 3-63 3-19 33
1B 3-70 3-56 1 2 61 3 4
3-75
3-76 5 43
76
7
Ascension
19
22 21 9 10 6 8 9 12 14 15
64
16 11 13
10B

Congress - Tangipahoa - Senate Bill 121 Enrolled (2026RS)
3-2 3-1 17 ! 5 1-2 6-1
Washington
109 6-2
201
4-1 St. Helena 5-1 112 114
4-2
115B 116
111A
502
28 118A 118 F01 204 205
203
9 117
119
6B 202
206
! 121
5
33
123 120A 207 502
505
121A
120
11A
302
6A 301 303 504
129A
125 127 40A 43 44 120B 101
11
10 314
133 41
42 143 C09
30 49 141 Tangipahoa C11 A01 A03
8A 29 8B 12 133A 45A 45B 46 47 141A 143A ! 108 C06 C08 304
1 118 St. Tammany
122C 305
137B 139 122B 106A C02 A04 A02
137C 72A 308
13A 13B 137 70A 72 145 147 122A 106 116 114 105 115 110 309 313A02A
137A 310 307
137D 70 107 312A
19A Livingston 73 111 112 104 312 406
! 6 19 31 149 71 74 103 306 418 429 420
38
402
124 102 419 404 405
413 417
14
411
401
M07 430 412
M12 422
408 M10
151 403
426
32 MD1
149A
22
15
M01
18 M02 M04 409
ZZZZZZ
703
16
5-4
ZZZZZZ St. John ZZZZZZ
17

Congress - Calcasieu - Senate Bill 121 Enrolled (2026RS)
13
10
3-1
11
12A
1 660 3-2 Allen 2-2
Beauregard 600 601 2-3
1A 602 603 12
11B
17 16
18
662 161
661 160W
560
160E
164
663 16
162E 860N
163
! 4 664 162W 165 166W 166E 1 J 4 eff Davis
167
460E
360
460W 860S
463
461 464
561 562 300
400 440
301
441 304
401 302 305 361
402 404 308 309W309E 861W 800 801
465 Calcasieu 310
406 408 405 306 314 312 861E 23
313E
700 317 318 321
316W 316E 322 323 324
703 762 466W 466E 467 362 325 3 3 2 3 6 1 327 328 330
702 363 334 335 329
333
336 339 338 364
340
371N
366
372
! 369
760 761 3 368
468
367
261
260
365 262
370
469
371S
3 Jeff Davis
1 4 Cameron 5S 5N
16B

Congress - St. Landry - Senate Bill 121 Enrolled (2026RS)
5040
4030 5010 1C
5041 1B
4020
2
1A
4001
5020 2A
4010
4011
1 2C
1130
4
1140 1020
1D 7
3010 5
1091
!
! 5 3
4 3040 Evangeline 1030
1162 1160 1031 4 2 2B Pointe Coupee
1101 4A
1050
3050 4B !
6
3030
3051 1150
3070 9 6 7A
3031 3052
3071 8 7 13
9A St. Landry 14
1041
2010A 13
11
2010 20
10 12 15
18B 10A 20B 16
21
14A 17
45 44A 18 25 26 14
48 44 44B 24 27 14B
2030 18A 16A
30
46 47 50 49
52 51 32A
28
24B 30A 30B
29 31
29A 31Iberville
3-5 32
7-3 33 34A
! 3 3-1 33A 36 39 39A
7-4 3-3
3-2 3-4 35 37 40
Acadia 34 38
42
3-7 41A 37A
41 39 41
122
43 1 43 St. Martin
4-6 42 40
2-4 2-1
2-3 Lafayette 2 31
4-2 2-2 3 123 5 6 34 33 35 38